Oklahoma, session 2025, SB749.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


The Legislature finds that:


1. Freedom of expression and inquiry at institutions of higher


education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education are

Req. No. 843 Page 1


indispensable to the pursuit of educational excellence and the


furtherance of the ordered individual liberty established in this


nation’s founding documents;


2. Institutions of higher education within The Oklahoma State


System of Higher Education have a duty to promote and defend freedom


of expression and inquiry and the societal consensus on the ordered


individual liberty established in this nation’s founding documents


that sustain it;


3. Institutions of higher education within The Oklahoma State


System of Higher Education should seek and foster intellectual


diversity among administrators, faculty, students, and employees;


4. Positively or negatively incentivizing, informally


pressuring, or otherwise compelling students or employees of


institutions of higher education within The Oklahoma State System of


Higher Education to embrace divisive concepts is contrary to the


mutual respect and collegial processes essential to the free


exchange of ideas;


5. Measures taken to ensure nondiscrimination cannot be allowed


to undermine the principles of merit and excellence in the core


activities of institutions of higher education within The Oklahoma


State System of Higher Education; and


6. Increased institutional transparency and oversight are


needed to lessen the risk of diminished excellence resulting from


the imposition or advocacy of divisive concepts.

Req. No. 843 Page 2


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3205.15 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Higher Education Freedom of Expression and Transparency Act”.


B. For the purposes of this section:


1. “Divisive concept” means a concept that:


a. one race or sex is inherently superior to another race


or sex,


b. an individual, by virtue of his or her race or sex, is


inherently racist, sexist, or oppressive, whether


consciously or unconsciously,


c. an individual should be discriminated against or


receive adverse treatment solely or partly because of


his or her race or sex,


d. members of one race or sex cannot and should not


attempt to treat others without respect to race or


sex,


e. an individual’s moral character is necessarily


determined by his or her race or sex, and


f. an individual, by virtue of his or her race or sex,


bears responsibility for actions committed in the past


by other members of the same race or sex; and



Req. No. 843 Page 3


2. “Institution of higher education” means institutions of


higher education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher


Education.


C. For purposes of approving or scheduling usage of an


institution of higher education’s property, an institution of higher


education shall not show bias or favoritism:


1. Based upon a guest speaker’s or a guest speaker’s student-


sponsoring group’s viewpoint, race, creed, color, religion,


nonviolent political ideology, or nonviolent political party


affiliation; or


2. For a student group that, or a guest speaker who, intends to


maintain a peaceful campus presence and peaceful use of the


institution of higher education’s property because the institution


of higher education receives threatened simple breaches of the peace


or nondestructive disruptions from groups or individuals who oppose


the student group’s or guest speaker’s presence on campus.


D. An institution of higher education shall not:


1. Require a student group to pay fees or security deposits


that are not charged to all other student groups; or


2. Deny a student group access to the institution of higher


education’s property, if the property is routinely used by other


student groups.


E. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C of this


section, an institution of higher education may restrict or deny use

Req. No. 843 Page 4


of the institution of higher education’s property for public


displays, organized public gatherings, or public demonstrations if


the display, gathering, or demonstration would violate Section 1021


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


F. 1. To assess the extent to which a divisive concept may


have been included or has otherwise affected curriculum, beginning


with the 2025-2026 academic year, each institution of higher


education shall publish a current syllabus for each course offered


in the current semester on the institution of higher education’s


website no later than the seventh business day following the first


day of class for the semester.


2. Each syllabus published pursuant to paragraph 1 of this


subsection shall include, but not be limited to:


a. the title and catalog description of the course,


b. the course instructor’s name,


c. the course’s required or elective status for relevant


majors or general education,


d. a brief description of each assignment, examination,


lecture, discussion, or other class activity,


e. the title of each book that is assigned or recommended


for the course including any textbook or workbook, and


f. the final grades for the three (3) most recent


semesters during which the course was offered.



Req. No. 843 Page 5


G. To assess the extent to which learning outcomes may have


been affected by the inclusion of a divisive concept in the student


learning experience, the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education


shall promulgate rules to require institutions of higher education


to submit data and information requested by the State Regents in a


standardized format to allow the State Regents to provide an online


organized data compilation that details the following:


1. The number of students who completed a program at the


institution of higher education for the three (3) most recent


academic years, disaggregated by underserved minority students; and


2. Results for students identified in paragraph 1 of this


subsection on nationally recognized assessments that assess a


student’s readiness for postsecondary education, if available to the


institution of higher education, and such students’ final grade


point average at the institution of higher education.


H. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall


promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section. The


rules shall:


1. Establish a process by which a student enrolled in or an


employee of an institution of higher education may submit a


complaint of an alleged violation of the provisions of this section


to the institution;





Req. No. 843 Page 6


2. Require each institution of higher education that receives a


complaint pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection to investigate


the report;


3. Create a corrective action plan for an institution of higher


education that is found to have violated the provisions of this


section; and


4. Create a reporting requirement for complaints filed, the


findings of resulting investigations, and any corrective action


plans developed pursuant to this subsection.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-843 EB 1/19/2025 5:42:29 AM

















Req. No. 843 Page 7